Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 5. RAILROADS

SUBTITLE Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 194. PROVISION OF UTILITIES BY CERTAIN RAILWAY CORPORATIONS

Sec. 194.001. EXTENSION OF UTILITY LINES. (a) This section applies only to a corporation organized under the laws of this state that is authorized to:

(1) construct, acquire, and operate electric or other lines of railway in and between municipalities in this state; and

(2) acquire, hold, and operate other public utilities in and adjacent to the municipalities in or through which the corporation operates.

(b) A corporation described by Subsection (a) may extend its electric light, power, or gas lines to supply light, power, or gas, as appropriate, to the public residing beyond the territory adjacent to the municipalities in or through which the corporation operates.

(c) For the purpose of extending a line described by Subsection (b), the corporation has the same rights and powers of extension held by a public service corporation engaged in the supply and sale of electric light, power, or gas as provided by law.

(d) The authority granted under this section does not expressly or impliedly repeal any antitrust law of this state.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 194.002. DISTRIBUTION OF GAS OR ELECTRICITY FOLLOWING ABANDONMENT OF STREET RAILWAY. (a) This section applies only to a private corporation that on April 26, 1937, was authorized by its charter and the statutes of this state to operate street and interurban railways and had the power to distribute and sell gas or electricity to the public.

(b) During the unexpired period of its corporate charter, a corporation that abandons or discontinues or has abandoned or discontinued the operation of its railways or motor buses substituted for the railways may continue to distribute and sell electricity or gas as authorized by its corporate charter and statutes in the same manner as if the abandonment or discontinuation had not occurred.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.